California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
If the assessment was levied under the Municipal Improvement Act of 1913 or other law, the proceeds of the sale of the bonds shall be paid into the fund of the proceeding to represent the assessments for which the bonds were issued. If the bonds are sold for an amount in excess of par, the excess shall be paid into the fund specified in Section 10424 or other special fund specified in the law pursuant to which the assessment was levied to finance the acquisitions or improvements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 194, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 6. FORM AND CONTENT OF BONDS [8650. - 8655.]

8650.

(a) Except as provided otherwise by the legislative body pursuant to Section 8650.1, the bonds shall be issued in series and an even annual proportion of the aggregate principal sum thereof shall be payable on the second day of September every year succeeding the first 12 months after their date, until the whole is paid. The bonds shall bear interest at a rate not in excess of the maximum rate permitted by law from the 31st day after recording the assessment if the assessment was levied under the Improvement Act of 1911, or from their date if
 the assessment was levied under the Municipal Improvement Act of 1913 or other law, on all sums unpaid, until the whole of the principal sum and interest are paid.

(b) Interest shall be payable semiannually on the second day of March and September, respectively, of each year. The first payment of interest shall become due on the interest payment date which is six months before the maturity of the first series of bonds, but, if any portion of the interest is funded, the legislative body may specify that the first payment of interest shall become due on any earlier interest payment date following the date of the bonds. Interest shall be payable to the registered holders of the bonds as their names and addresses appeared on the records of the issuing agency or its registration agent on the 15th day of the calendar month preceding the interest payment date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 194, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

8650.1.

The legislative body, in its discretion, may determine, either (a) in the resolution of intention describing the improvement work, or (b) thereafter in any change proceedings taken under and in accordance with the provisions of the same act under which the resolution of intention was adopted, that the principal amount of the bonds maturing or becoming subject to mandatory prior redemption each year shall be other than an amount equal to an even annual proportion of the aggregate principal of the bonds, and it may determine that the amount of principal maturing or
 becoming subject to mandatory prior redemption in each year plus the amount of interest payable in that year will be an aggregate amount that is substantially equal each year, except for the moneys falling due on the first maturity or mandatory prior redemption date of the bonds which shall be adjusted to reflect the amount of interest earned from the date when the bonds bear interest to the date when the first interest is payable on the bonds. Notwithstanding Section 8651.5, to the extent that the determination to issue bonds pursuant to Section 8570 includes term bonds, the legislative body shall provide for mandatory prior redemption of those bonds, without premium, through annual sinking fund installments conforming to the requirements of this section.

Notwithstanding Section 8652, the legislative body may prescribe the form of the bonds and shall fix the date of the bonds. The legislative body may divide the principal amount of any issue into two or more
 divisions and fix different dates for the payment of bonds of each division. The bonds of one division may be made payable at different times than bonds of any other division.

The legislative body, in its discretion, may determine in like manner to classify assessments into different terms of maturity so that smaller assessments may be made to mature over a shorter period of time and, in that event, the bond declaration in the resolution of intention, or in the change proceedings taken under and in accordance with the provisions of the same act under which the resolution of intention was adopted, in the assessment, and in the notice of recording the assessment may recite that the last installment of bonds shall mature a maximum rather than an exact number of years from the second day of September next succeeding 12 months from their date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 613, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

8651.

The final series of installment of the bonds shall mature and be payable on a date which shall not exceed 39 years from the second day of September next succeeding 12 months from their date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 65, Sec. 4.   Effective June 6, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

8651.5.

Each bond, or any portion of the bond in a fixed amount or any integral multiple of the fixed amount, shall be subject to redemption in advance of its maturity on any interest payment date upon payment to the registered owner of the principal and accrued interest to the date of redemption together with a redemption premium equal to 5 percent of the principal. Prior to issuance of the bonds, the legislative body may provide for a reduction of the redemption premium to an amount equal to not less than 3 percent of the principal for the first five years of the term of the bonds or to any amount, including zero, after the first five years of the term of the
 bonds, or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 446, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

8652.

The bonds shall be substantially in the following form:United States of America
 State of California
 County of ______REGISTERED
 NumberREGISTERED
$IMPROVEMENT BOND
 City (or County) of (naming it)
__________
 SERIES NO.______INTEREST
 RATEMATURITY
 DATEBOND
 DATE
____, 20__CUSIP
 NUMBERUnder and by virtue of the Improvement Bond Act of 1915, Division 10 (commencing with Section 8500) of the Streets and Highways Code (the “Act”), the City (or County) of ____, County of ____, State of California, (the “City” or “County”) will, out of the redemption fund for the payment of the bonds issued upon the unpaid portion of assessments made for the acquisition, work, and improvements more fully described in proceedings taken pursuant to Resolution of Intention No. ____, adopted by the (legislative body) of the City (or County) of ____ on the ____ day of ____, 20__, (as later amended), pay to ____ or registered assigns, on the maturity date stated above, the principal sum of ____, in lawful
 money of the United States of America and in like manner will pay interest from the interest payment date next preceding the date on which this bond is authenticated, unless this bond is authenticated and registered as of an interest payment date, in which event it shall bear interest from such interest payment date, or unless this bond is authenticated and registered prior to ____, 20__, (first interest payment date) in which event it shall bear interest from its date, until payment of such principal sum shall have been discharged, at the rate per annum stated above, payable semiannually on March 2 and September 2 in each year commencing on ____, 20__. Both the principal hereof and redemption premium hereon are payable at ____ as Transfer Agent, Registrar, and Paying Agent, in ____, California, and the interest hereon is payable by check or draft mailed to the owner hereof at the owner’s address as it appears on the records of the ____ (issuing agency or registration agent) or at an address that has been
 filed with the ____ (issuing agency or registration agent) for that purpose, as of the 15th day of the calendar month immediately preceding each interest payment date.

This bond will continue to bear interest after maturity at the rate above stated; provided, it is presented at maturity and payment thereof is refused upon the sole ground that there are not sufficient moneys in said redemption fund with which to pay same. If it is not presented at maturity, interest thereon will run until maturity.

This bond shall not be entitled to any benefit under the Act or the Resolution Authorizing Issuance of Bonds (the “Resolution of Issuance”), or become valid or obligatory for any purpose, until the certificate of authentication and registration hereon endorsed shall have been dated and signed by the ____ (issuing agency or registration agent).

IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the City (or County) of
 ____ has caused this bond to be signed in facsimile by the Treasurer of the City (or County) and by its Clerk, and has caused its corporate seal to be reproduced in facsimile hereon all as of the ____ day of ____, 20__.CITY (OR COUNTY) OF ________ 
ClerkTreasurer[SEAL]
Certificate of Authentication 
and Registration
This is one of the bonds described
 in the within mentioned Resolution 
 of Issuance, which has been 
 authenticated and registered 
 on
By ADDITIONAL PROVISIONS OF THE BOND

This bond is one of several annual series of bonds of like date, tenor, and effect, but differing in amounts, maturities, and interest rates, issued by the City (or County) of ____ under the Act and the Resolution of Issuance, for the purpose of providing means for paying for the improvements described in the proceedings, and is secured by the moneys in the redemption fund and by the unpaid portion of assessments made for the payment of those improvements, and, including principal and interest, is payable exclusively out of the redemption fund.

This bond is transferable by the registered owner hereof, in person or by the owner’s attorney duly authorized in writing, at the office of ____ (issuing agency or its registration agent), subject
 to the terms and conditions provided in the Resolution of Issuance, including the payment of certain charges, if any, upon surrender and cancellation of this bond. Upon transfer, a new registered bond or bonds, of any authorized denomination or denominations, of the same maturity, for the same aggregate principal amount, will be issued to the transferee in exchange therefor.

Bonds shall be registered only in the name of an individual (including joint owners), a corporation, a partnership, or a trust.

Neither the issuing agency nor the registration agent shall be required to exchange or to register the transfer of bonds during the 15 days immediately preceding any interest payment date.

The issuing agency and the registration agent may treat the owner hereof as the absolute owner for all purposes, and the issuing agency and the registration agent shall not be affected by any notice
 to the contrary.

This bond or any portion of it in the amount of five thousand dollars ($5,000), or any integral multiple thereof, may be redeemed and paid in advance of maturity upon the second day of March or September in any year by giving at least 30 days’ notice by registered or certified mail or by personal service to the registered owner hereof at the owner’s address as it appears on the registration books of the ____ (issuing agency or registration agent) by paying principal and accrued interest together with a premium equal to ____ percent of the principal.

This bond is not subject to refunding pursuant to the procedures of Division 11 (commencing with Section 9000) or Division 11.5 (commencing with Section 9500) of the Streets and Highways Code prior to ______, ___. (If applicable).

I hereby certify that the following is a correct copy of the signed legal opinion of
 _____.

City (or County) Clerk

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 268.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

8653.

The bonds shall be signed by the treasurer and the clerk of the legislative body. However, the legislative body may by order authorize the use upon the bonds of an engraved, printed, or lithographed signature of the treasurer and the clerk of the legislative body in place of a signature by hand. It may also authorize the seal to be placed in like manner on the bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 128.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

8654.

The bonds shall bear interest at the rate specified or determined in the proceedings. The bonds maturing in any year shall constitute the annual series of that year and the aggregate principal of the bonds in such series shall equal the annual proportion of the aggregate principal sum of the entire bond issue hereinbefore referred to.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 65, Sec. 8.   Effective June 6, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

8655.

The bonds, by their issuance, shall be conclusive evidence of the regularity of all proceedings had prior thereto under this division and under the law pursuant to which the assessment was levied.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 194, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 6.5. VARIABLE INTEREST RATE BONDS [8660. - 8665.5.]

8660.

As an alternative to any other authority, a legislative body may, at its discretion, issue bonds bearing a variable interest rate pursuant to this division. This part does not alter or restrict authority to authorize assessments or issue bonds pursuant to any other provision of this division in any way. All provisions of this division shall apply to proceedings pursuant to this part, except as expressly provided in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1332, Sec. 7.   Effective October 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

8660.5.

The legislative body may determine to issue serial or term bonds, or both, bearing a variable interest rate that represent and are secured by assessments which are made to pay the cost of any authorized work or improvement. The bonds shall be sold at not less than 95 percent of the principal amount in the manner determined by the legislative body.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1332, Sec. 7.   Effective October 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

8661.

If the legislative body determines to issue bonds as provided in this part to represent the expense of any proposed work or improvement, it shall, in the resolution of intention to do the work, do all of the following:

(a) Declare that the serial or term bonds are issued pursuant to this division to represent the expenses of the proposed work or improvement.

(b) Specify that the bonds may bear a variable rate of interest.

(c) Specify the maximum rate of interest which the bonds may bear.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1332, Sec. 7.   Effective October 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

8662.

The bonds shall be substantially in the form set forth in Section 8652, except as revised to conform to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1332, Sec. 7.   Effective October 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

8663.

The unpaid assessments shall be payable in substantially the manner set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 8680, or in substantially the same manner, but at more frequent intervals, as provided by the legislative body by resolution. The legislative body may designate an official, including an official other than the county tax collector, or other agent, to collect and maintain records of the collection of the assessments, including a procedure other than through the property tax collection procedure prescribed in this division. The legislative body may authorize an additional assessment to pay the costs of collection, not to exceed the percentages or amounts set forth in Section 8682, and an additional amount to cover the costs of registration, not to exceed the percentages and amounts set forth in Section 8682.1. The legislative body may authorize an additional assessment to pay for incidental expenses of the financing. The assessments and the interest on the assessments for each pay period are payable at the end of the pay period and are delinquent thereafter, and shall bear the same proportionate penalties and interest after delinquency as the assessment installments in the subject proceedings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 874, Sec. 6.   Effective September 17, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

8663.5.

Interest on all unpaid assessments shall run from the date of the bonds, and shall be computed for each interest pay period at the date determined pursuant to the terms of the bond for that interest pay period.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1332, Sec. 7.   Effective October 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

8664.

Each bond, or any portion of the bond in a fixed amount or any integral multiple of the fixed amount, shall be subject to redemption in advance of its maturity on any interest payment date upon payment to the registered owner of the principal and accrued interest to the date of redemption together with a redemption premium, if any, as determined by the legislative body, not to exceed 5 percent of the principal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1332, Sec. 7.   Effective October 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

8664.3.

The legislative body may, by resolution, specify that the interest rate on the bonds may vary from time to time as determined by a bond index or some other means prescribed in the resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1332, Sec. 7.   Effective October 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

8664.5.

The legislative body may, by resolution, specify terms and conditions under which the bonds may be converted to a fixed interest rate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1332, Sec. 7.   Effective October 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

8665.

The legislative body may, by resolution, specify terms and conditions under which the city agrees to repurchase the bonds. The legislative body may secure a letter of credit or other instrument to secure payment or repurchase of any bonds, and the resulting costs, including costs of initially securing, maintaining, or making any payments arising from the exercise of, a letter of credit or other instrument, may be treated as incidental expenses. The legislative body may engage a remarketing agent and an indexing agent, subject to terms and conditions agreed to by the legislative body, and the resulting costs may be treated as incidental expenses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 874, Sec. 7.   Effective September 17, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

8665.5.

The notice of assessment recorded with the county recorder pursuant to Section 3114 shall include the following statement:

Notice is further given that unpaid assessments are subject to interest at a variable interest rate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1332, Sec. 7.   Effective October 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 7. BOND RECORDS AND PAYMENTS [8670. - 8672.]

8670.

The bonds and interest shall be paid at the office of the treasurer or of another paying agent designated by the legislative body.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1332, Sec. 8.   Effective October 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

8671.

The treasurer or designated paying agent shall keep a redemption fund designated by the name of the bonds, in which there shall be placed all sums received from the collection of the assessments made. The fund shall be considered a trust fund for the benefit of the bondholders. The redemption fund shall be used for paying principal and interest and redemption premium, if any, payments on the bonds directly, or money in the fund may be forwarded to the paying agent for these purposes. Under no circumstances shall the bonds or the interest thereon be paid out of any other fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 194, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

8672.

The treasurer or the designated paying agent shall keep a register in his or her office showing the series, number, date, amount, rate of interest, and last known holder of each bond, and the number and amount of each interest coupon paid. The treasurer or agent shall cancel and file each bond and coupon which he or she pays. The register, canceled bonds, and coupons shall be retained for five years beyond the last maturity of the bond issue.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 446, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 8. COLLECTION OF ASSESSMENTS [8680. - 8689.]

8680.

(a) The unpaid assessments shall be payable in annual installments corresponding in number and proportionate amount to the number of installments and principal amounts of bonds maturing or becoming subject to mandatory prior redemption in each year pursuant to Section 8650.1. An annual proportion of each assessment shall be payable in each fiscal year preceding the date of maturity or mandatory prior redemption date of each of the bonds which have been issued, sufficient to pay the bonds when due. The annual proportion of each assessment coming due in any year, together with the annual interest on the assessment, shall be payable in the same manner and at the same time and in the same installments as the general taxes of the city on real property are payable, and the assessment installments and the annual interest on the assessment shall be payable and become delinquent at the same times and in the same proportionate amounts and, except as provided in subdivision (b), shall bear the same proportionate penalties and interest after delinquency as do the general taxes on real property of the city.

(b) The legislative body may provide, in the resolution of intention to do the work, that a penalty of 2 percent per month of the total amount of the delinquent installment shall be added to the delinquent installment after the close of business on the delinquency date and an additional penalty of 2 percent of the amount of the delinquency shall be added at the beginning of business on the 10th day of each succeeding month until that delinquent installment and all penalties thereon are fully paid. This penalty shall be in lieu of all other penalties assessed by other provisions of law. The treasurer or the designated paying agent shall collect the penalties with, and as a part of, the delinquent installments, or the legislative body may designate another official and another method of collection. All penalties collected shall be deposited in the redemption fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 446, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

8681.

Interest on all unpaid assessments shall begin to run from the date of filing of the contractor’s statement, or as otherwise provided in the law pursuant to which the assessment was levied, or from the date of the bonds if the assessment was levied under the Municipal Improvement Act of 1913 or other law, and shall be computed at the rate specified in the bonds secured by the assessments. For each year interest shall be computed and collected up to the next second day of September succeeding, no deduction being made by reason of any installment of the assessment being due or paid prior thereto in such year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 194, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

8682.

(a) A copy of the order of the legislative body determining the assessments remaining unpaid and upon the security of which bonds are issued shall be filed in the office of the auditor. The auditor shall keep a record in his or her office showing the several installments of principal and interest on the assessments which are to be collected in each year during the term of the bonds. The auditor shall annually enter in his or her assessment roll on which taxes will next become due, opposite each lot or parcel of land affected in a space marked “public improvement assessment,” or by other suitable designation, the several installments of the assessment coming due during the fiscal year covered by the assessment roll, including in each case the interest due on the total unpaid assessments.

(b) The auditor shall also add a maximum of 5 percent of the amount of the installments and of the interest so entered, not to exceed the city treasurer’s estimate of the expenses of collection, and in any case not to exceed eight dollars ($8) per lot or parcel per installment, except with the landowner’s written consent. The expenses of collection shall include necessary administrative expenses of the city incurred in providing the auditor with current information regarding the ownership or division of the affected lots or parcels of land to ensure the proper entry by the auditor in his or her assessment roll of the several installments of the assessment coming due during the fiscal year covered by the assessment roll and the timely collection of the installments. The percentages, and the amount represented by the installments, when collected shall belong to the city and shall cover the expenses and compensation of the city treasurer incurred in the collection of the assessments, and of the interest and penalties added on to the assessments. No other percentage or amount shall be claimed by the legislative body for the collections.

(c) In the case of an assessment district created prior to January 1, 1988, the amount of collection costs which may be collected pursuant to this section may be the amount which could have been collected pursuant to this section as it read prior to being amended by Chapter 874 of the Statutes of 1986.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 446, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

8682.1.

(a) In addition to the amounts set forth in Section 8682, the auditor shall further annually enter in the assessment roll on which taxes will next become due, opposite each lot or parcel of land affected, in the manner set forth in Section 8682, each lot’s or parcel’s pro rata share of the annual expenses of the city in connection with the registration of the bonds under the system of registration authorized by Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 5050) of Division 6 of Title 1 of the Government Code, as determined by the legislative body. The expenses shall include the amount or estimated amount necessary to pay the fees and charges coming due during the fiscal year covered by the assessment roll of corporate or other authenticating agents, transfer agents, registrars, paying agents, agents engaged to assist in complying with federal arbitrage requirements, or other agents of the city. If the city performs any transfer, registration, authentication, payment, or other function described in this section, the expenses shall include a pro rata amount of the salaries of the city employees involved in the performance of the functions and all other costs incurred by the city in connection with the functions.

(b) Alternatively, the legislative body may elect to include in the assessment, and in the amount of the bonds, the estimated aggregate total of the expenses throughout the term of the bonds and to pay the annual amounts of the expenses from the fund created. Any amount remaining in the fund upon the retirement of the bonds shall be disposed of as provided in Section 8783.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 104, Sec. 18.)
-------------------------------------------

8683.

If the legislative body conducting the proceedings is not a county and collections of assessments are made by county officials, the county auditor shall, within 90 days after each installment becomes delinquent, render to the city a detailed report showing the amounts of the installments, interest, penalties, and percentages so collected on each proceeding and from what property collected, identifying any properties which are delinquent and the amount and length of time in arrears, and also giving a statement of the percentages retained for the expenses of making such collections.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 874, Sec. 10.   Effective September 17, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

8684.

Taxpayers shall have the same right to pay assessments together with interest, and any penalties thereon, under protest as they have to pay general city taxes under protest, but their written protest must accompany each such payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

8685.

If any lot or parcel of land affected by any assessment is not separately assessed on the tax roll so that the installment of the assessment to be collected can be conveniently entered thereon, then the auditor shall enter on the roll a description of the lot or parcel affected, with the name of the owners if known, but otherwise the owners may be described as “unknown owners,” and extend the proper installment opposite the same.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

8686.

If it appears to the legislative body that, according to the dates when taxes are collected in the city, there will be an insufficient amount on hand to pay the interest when due, according to the method of collection provided by the preceding provisions of this division, the legislative body may direct that such interest or some portion of it be collected in the year preceding that in which the same would otherwise be collected, and thereupon such interest or portion thereof shall be extended on the rolls for such preceding year and be due and collected therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

8688.

Any interested owner shall have the right to tender to the treasurer in payment or part payment of any installment of the assessment or interest or penalties thereon which may be due or payable, any bond secured thereby, the bond to be taken at par and credit to be given for the accrued interest shown thereby computed to the date of tender. The treasurer shall thereupon cancel the bond and shall cause proper credit therefor to be entered on the records of the assessment, in the office of the auditor and tax collector.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 194, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

8689.

Within the Bass Lake Improvement District in Madera County, a person who has an interest in any land in the improvement district less than a fee interest, such as a leaseholder or subleaseholder, may pay, and the tax collector may accept payment for the entire assessment or any installment thereon, including the assessment on the fee interest. When the tax collector accepts such payment on a portion or part of a parcel, the tax collector shall record such information as required to identify such payment, and the tax collector may add to such assessment a fee as required to pay any additional costs incurred for accepting such payment on a portion of the parcel assessed. The tax collector shall deposit all such fees in the general fund of the treasury.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 833.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 9. ASSESSMENT LIENS AND REASSESSMENTS [8700. - 8708.]

8700.

In the event bonds are ordered to be issued, the unpaid assessments, as shown on the list filed by the street superintendent and determined by the legislative body, and any reassessments which may be issued thereon or in lieu thereof, together with interest thereon, shall remain and constitute a trust fund for the redemption and payment of the principal of the bonds and for the interest which may be due thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

8701.

Such assessments and reassessments and each installment thereof and the interest and penalties thereon shall constitute a lien against the lots and parcels of land on which they are made, until the same be paid, but for a period not exceeding the time within which an action might be brought on the last series of bonds issued upon the security of such unpaid assessments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1465.)
-------------------------------------------

8702.

The lien, whether bonds issued to represent the assessment or otherwise, shall be subordinate to all fixed special assessment liens previously imposed upon the same property, but it shall have priority over all fixed special assessment liens which may thereafter be created against the property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1465.)
-------------------------------------------

8703.

The lien of a reassessment and a refunding assessment shall have the same priority as the original assessment to which it relates. A supplemental assessment is a new assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1465.)
-------------------------------------------

8704.

Unmatured installments, interest and penalties secured by any such lien or liens shall not be deemed to be within the terms of any general warranty of title.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1465.)
-------------------------------------------

8705.

If any assessment heretofore or hereafter issued is void or unenforceable, for any cause, or if bonds are issued to represent or be secured by any assessments and that issuance is not effective through the curative provisions in relation thereto under the law pursuant to which the assessment was levied or under this division to make them valid and enforceable, then a reassessment may be made. The reassessment shall be made upon the demand of the owner or holder of bonds aggregating one-third of the principal amount outstanding, or upon order of the legislative body, and shall be made in the manner and form provided by the law pursuant to which the assessment was levied, without regard to whether the acquisition or improvement has been done or is proposed to be done, if any valid procedure is provided, and otherwise as provided by Chapter 19 (commencing with Section 5500) of Part 3 of Division 7.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 194, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

8706.

When made, the reassessment shall constitute a trust fund for the redemption and payment of the original bonds issued against the original assessment; or the legislative body may call in the original issue of bonds outstanding and issue new bonds upon the security of the reassessment in lieu thereof. If the legislative body determines that new bonds shall be issued upon the security of the reassessment, the notice of hearing upon the reassessment shall contain a declaration of intention to issue bonds substantially in the form provided for in Section 8573. Upon confirmation of the reassessment the legislative body may issue the new bonds in the manner that it determines.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 194, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

8707.

If the legislative body calls in the original issue of outstanding bonds, it may direct the treasurer to, and the treasurer shall thereupon, advance the maturity of the outstanding bonds bearing interest in the manner provided in Part 11 (commencing with Section 8750), notwithstanding the fact that there may not be surplus moneys in the redemption fund with which to pay the same. New bonds shall be issued in an aggregate amount equal to the total balance of the reassessment unpaid and shall bear interest from their date at the rate fixed by the legislative body.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 194, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

8708.

Upon the surrender of the outstanding bonds, the new bonds shall be issued ratably to the holders of the original outstanding bonds. Each holder of such original bonds shall be entitled to such proportion of the new bonds as the total amount of the principal and interest due him on his original bonds, upon the date of the recordation of the reassessment, bears to the total amount of the principal of the new bonds. In making distribution the legislative body may assign the different bonds and allot maturities in such manner as to it shall seem equitable.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8705 by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1465.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 10. DIVISION OF LAND AND BOND [8730. - 8734.]

8730.

If any lot or parcel of land upon which there is an unpaid assessment against which a bond has been issued under this division, is divided, including a division into condominium interests as defined in Section 783 of the Civil Code, or the ownership of a portion of such lot or parcel of land is transferred to another person, the legislative body may order the street superintendent to file with the clerk an amended assessment of the original parcel of land affected by such division or transfer of ownership, segregating and apportioning the unpaid installments of the original assessment in accordance with the benefits to the several parts of the original lot or parcel plus costs and fees of making the apportionment. The legislative body shall, at the time of ordering the amended assessment, fix the amount of costs and fees for preparing the amended assessment, the notices, and the amended assessment diagram.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 791.)
-------------------------------------------

8731.

The street superintendent shall file with the clerk a report and an amended assessment of the lots or parcels of land described in the order of the legislative body, together with a map or plat showing how such lots or parcels have been divided. The total amount of the assessments of the several portions of any one original lot or parcel shall be equal to the unpaid assessments upon the original lot or parcel of land, plus the costs and fees for making the amended assessment, the notices, and the amended assessment diagram as determined by the legislative body under Section 8730. The street superintendent shall apportion the costs and fees to the respective parcels in proportion to the amount of the divided assessments against the parcels. Prior to making a division and prior to making the amended assessment, the street superintendent shall notify the owner of the original parcel assessed, as the name of the owner appears on the last equalized roll for taxes, or as it is known to the street superintendent, of the order of the legislative body fixing the costs and fees of the apportionment, and directing that the payment thereof be made to the superintendent of streets within 15 days of the notification. In the event the amount of the costs and fees of the apportionment is not paid within 15 days of the notification, the superintendent of streets shall proceed to prepare the amended assessment and shall show separately thereon, but as a part of the total, the amount of costs and fees chargeable to each divided parcel. The street superintendent shall deposit all such costs and fees in the general fund of the treasury.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 791.)
-------------------------------------------

8732.
